Washington statutes.
RCW 7.24.020

Rights and status under written instruments, statutes, ordinances.

A person interested under a deed, will, written contract or other writings constituting a contract, or whose rights, status or other legal relations are affected by a statute, municipal ordinance, contract or franchise, may have determined any question of construction or validity arising under the instrument, statute, ordinance, contract or franchise and obtain a declaration of rights, status or other legal relations thereunder.

[ 1935 c 113 s 2; RRS s 784-2.]